District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-705

Incinerators for combustible refuse — Condemnation of sites authorized.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 4, 1929, 45 Stat. 1549, ch. 688, § 1
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 571, Pub. L. 91-358, title I,§§ 155(c)(21), 166(c)
Oct. 9, 1987, D.C. Law 7-38, § 6, 34 DCR 5326
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 301(d), 61 DCR 9971

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-707, § 8-708, § 8-709, and § 8-710.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-505.
1973 Ed., § 6-505.

Transfer of Functions

The functions, powers and duties of the National Capital Park and Planning Commission were transferred to the National Capital Planning Commission by the Act of July 19, 1952, 66 Stat. 790, ch. 949, § 1.

Editor's Notes

For present law, see Chapters 10B and 10C of this title.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.